Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,150
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Dissenters' rights; court costs and attorney's fees.

(1) The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under section 21-20,149 shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess costs against all or some of the dissenters, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds the dissenters acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in demanding payment under section 21-20,148.

(2) The court may also assess the attorney's fees and expenses and the fees and expenses of experts for the respective parties in amounts the court finds equitable:

(a) Against the corporation and in favor of any or all dissenters if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of sections 21-20,140 to 21-20,148; or

(b) Against either the corporation or a dissenter, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by sections 21-20,137 to 21-20,150.

(3) If the court finds that the services of counsel for any dissenter were of substantial benefit to other dissenters similarly situated and that the fees for those services should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may award to counsel reasonable fees to be paid out of the amounts awarded to the dissenters who were benefited.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 150.